en: Repairability index 9.3 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 9.3 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 9.3 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 9.3 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 9.3
it: Indice di riparabilità 9.3 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 9.3 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 9.3 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 9.3 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 9.3 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 9.3 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 9.3 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 9.3 - 法国

en: Repairability index 9.4 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 9.4 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 9.4 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 9.4 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 9.4
it: Indice di riparabilità 9.4 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 9.4 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 9.4 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 9.4 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 9.4 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 9.4 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 9.4 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 9.4 - 法国

en: Repairability index 9.5 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 9.5 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 9.5 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 9.5 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 9.5
it: Indice di riparabilità 9.5 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 9.5 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 9.5 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 9.5 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 9.5 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 9.5 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 9.5 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 9.5 - 法国

en: Repairability index 9.6 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 9.6 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 9.6 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 9.6 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 9.6
it: Indice di riparabilità 9.6 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 9.6 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 9.6 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 9.6 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 9.6 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 9.6 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 9.6 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 9.6 - 法国

en: Repairability index 9.7 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 9.7 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 9.7 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 9.7 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 9.7
it: Indice di riparabilità 9.7 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 9.7 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 9.7 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 9.7 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 9.7 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 9.7 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 9.7 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 9.7 - 法国

en: Repairability index 9.8 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 9.8 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 9.8 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 9.8 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 9.8
it: Indice di riparabilità 9.8 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 9.8 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 9.8 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 9.8 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 9.8 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 9.8 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 9.8 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 9.8 - 法国

en: Repairability index 9.9 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 9.9 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 9.9 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 9.9 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 9.9
it: Indice di riparabilità 9.9 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 9.9 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 9.9 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 9.9 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 9.9 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 9.9 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 9.9 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 9.9 - 法国

en: Repairability index 10.0 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 10.0 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 10.0 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 10.0 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 10.0
it: Indice di riparabilità 10.0 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 10.0 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 10.0 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 10.0 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 10.0 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 10.0 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 10.0 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 10.0 - 法国

de: Schädlich für Wasserorganismen, R52
en: Harmful to aquatic organisms, R52
cs: Škodlivý pro vodní organismy, R52
da: Skadelig for organismer\, der lever i vand, R52
el: Επιβλαβές για τους υδρόβιους οργανισµούς, R52
es: Nocivo para los organismos acuáticos, R52
et: Kahjulik veeorganismidele, R52
fi: Haitallista vesieliöille, R52
fr: Nocif pour les organismes aquatiques, R52
hu: Ártalmas a vízi szervezetekre, R52
it: Nocivo per gli organismi acquatici, R52
lt: Kenksminga vandens organizmams, R52
lv: Kaitīgs ūdens organismiem, R52
mt: Jaħmel ħsara lil organiżmi akwatiċi, R52
nl: Schadelijk voor in het water levende organismen, R52
no: Skadelig for vannlevende organismer, R52
pl: Działa szkodliwie na organizmy wodne, R52
pt: Nocivo para os organismos aquáticos, R52
sk: Škodlivý pre vodné organizmy, R52
sl: Škodljivo za vodne organizme, R52
sv: Skadligt för vattenlevande organismer, R52